Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1082.
do enact as follows:SB1082,15Section 1. 255.15 (3) (d) of the statutes is created to read:SB1082,2,46255.15 (3) (d) From the appropriation under s. 20.435 (1) (fm), the 1department may develop and implement a public health campaign aimed at the 2prevention of initiation of tobacco and electronic cigarette use and may award 3grants for local and regional organizations working on youth vaping and providing 4cessation services.SB1082,25Section 2. 255.15 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1082,2,126255.15 (4) Reports. Not later than April 15, 2002 2027, and annually 7thereafter, the department shall submit to the governor and to the chief clerk of 8each house of the legislature for distribution under s. 13.172 (2) a report that 9evaluates the success of the grant program programs under sub. (3). The report 10shall specify the number of grants awarded during the immediately preceding fiscal 11year and the purpose for which each grant was made. The report shall also specify 12donations and grants accepted by the department under sub. (5).SB1082,313Section 3. Fiscal changes.SB1082,2,2014(1) Public health campaign and grants for vaping prevention and 15cessation. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the 16department of health services under s. 20.435 (1) (fm), the dollar amount for fiscal 17year 2026-27 is increased by $2,000,000 to fund a public health campaign aimed at 18the prevention of initiation of tobacco and electronic cigarette use and for grants for 19local and regional organizations working on youth vaping and providing cessation 20services.SB1082,2,2121